Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF579.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 HF 579 (2) 91 jm/md/md H.F. 579 Section 1. Section 257.41, subsection 3, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 3. Limitation. 3 a. For Except as provided in paragraph âbâ , for the fiscal 4 year beginning July 1, 2013, and each succeeding fiscal year, 5 the ratio of the amount of the modified supplemental amount 6 established by the department of management compared to the 7 school districtâs total regular program district cost shall 8 not exceed two and one-half percent. However, if the school 9 districtâs highest such ratio so determined for any fiscal year 10 beginning on or after July 1, 2009, but before July 1, 2013, 11 exceeded two and one-half percent, the ratio may exceed two and 12 one-half percent but shall not exceed the highest such ratio 13 established during that period. 14 b. For the fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 15 2026, the ratio of the amount of the modified supplemental 16 amount established by the department of management compared 17 to the school districtâs total regular program district cost 18 may exceed the limitation otherwise applicable under paragraph 19 âaâ , not to exceed five percent, if such limit is approved at 20 an election. If the limit is approved, such ratio shall not 21 increase by more than one-half of one percent per fiscal year. 22 The board may on its own motion, and upon the written request 23 of not less than one hundred eligible electors or thirty 24 percent of the number of eligible electors voting at the last 25 regular school election, whichever is greater, shall, direct 26 the county commissioner of elections to submit the question to 27 the registered voters of the district. The authorization shall 28 be for the period of years authorized at election or until such 29 authorization is rescinded at election. The election shall 30 be held on a date specified in section 39.2, subsection 4, 31 paragraph âcâ . 32 -1- HF 579 (2) 91 jm/md/md 1/ 1